District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

2-1219.34a

Distribution of income between RLA Revitalization Corporation and the District.

Repealed.

History

Sept. 11, 1998, D.C. Law 12-144, § 30d-1
as added Dec. 7, 2004, D.C. Law 15-219, § 201(a)(3), 51 DCR 9142
Mar. 26, 2008, D.C. Law 17-138, § 103(a), 55 DCR 1689

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90 day) addition of section, see § 201(a)(3) of Anacostia Waterfront Corporation Emergency Act of 2004 (D.C. Act 15-586, November 1, 2004, 51 DCR 10681).